District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.07a

Mandatory clause for all Request for Proposals for Public Schools.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 307a
as added Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 702, 43 DCR 4569
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.7a.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 702 of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996, (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1997, (D.C. Law 12-4, May 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 3718).
For temporary addition of section, see § 702 of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).
For temporary repeal of § 702 of D.C. Act 11-360, see § 2(f) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-37, March 18, 1997, 44 DCR 1935).